Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB764.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a part to read:PART XIFOOD SECURITYChapter121. Fresh Food Financing InitiativeCHAPTER 121FRESH FOOD FINANCING INITIATIVESec.12101. Scope of chapter.1234567891011121314151617 12102. Purpose.12103. Definitions.12104. Establishment.12105. Administration of program.12106. Grant fund eligibility.12107. Regulations.12108. Grant money.§ 12101. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to the Fresh Food Financing Initiative.§ 12102. Purpose.The purpose of this chapter is to strengthen local food systems and increase market opportunities for Pennsylvania farmers by providing grant money for:(1) A State program designed to increase the availability of fresh and nutritious food, known as the Pennsylvania Fresh Food Financing Initiative, that will stimulate capital, job creation and economic vitality.(2) Construction, rehabilitation or expansion of grocery stores, farmers' markets or retail food establishments in underserved and low-income or moderate-income communities in this Commonwealth.§ 12103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Black, Indigenous and person of color communities" or "BIPOC communities." Municipalities with:(1) a Black, Indigenous and person of color population of 50% or higher; or(2) a Black, Indigenous and person of color population 20250HB0764PN0788 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 greater than 700 people."Farmers' market." A building, structure or place owned, leased or otherwise in possession by a person, municipal corporation or public or private organization, used or intended to be used by two or more farmers or an association of farmers for the purpose of selling agricultural commodities directly to consumers and which is physically located within this Commonwealth."Food access organization." A nonprofit organization with expertise in improving access to food in underserved communities."Grocery store." A for-profit or not-for-profit self-service retail establishment that primarily sells meat, seafood, fruits, vegetables, dairy products, dry groceries, household products and sundries."Low-income or moderate-income community." A census tract as reported in the most recently completed Federal decennial census published by the United States Census Bureau that has a poverty rate of at least 20% or in which the median family income does not exceed 80% of the greater of the Statewide or metropolitan median family income."Program." The Pennsylvania Fresh Food Financing Initiative established under section 12104 (relating to establishment)."Regional anchor supermarket." A company that owns multiple grocery stores within a given region."Retail food establishment." As defined under section 5702 (relating to definitions)."Underserved community." A census tract determined to be an area with low grocery store access by either the United States Department of Agriculture as identified in the Food Access 20250HB0764PN0788 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Research Atlas or through a methodology that has been adopted for use by another governmental entity or food access organization."USDA-designated food desert." A census tract declared to be a food desert by the United States Department of Agriculture's Economic Research Service.§ 12104. Establishment.The Pennsylvania Fresh Food Financing Initiative is established.§ 12105. Administration of program.(a) Administration.--The program shall be administered by the department. The department may collaborate with the Department of Community and Economic Development to improve food access in this Commonwealth.(b) Program management.--The department shall develop and establish program guidelines and eligibility criteria to meet the needs of program applicants and the communities served.(c) Program priority.--(1) The program shall promote local agricultural products by placing priority on projects producing, aggregating, sourcing or selling Pennsylvania agricultural commodities, including the department's Pennsylvania Preferred® program, that : (i) are located in, owned by or primarily serve BIPOC communities. Eligibility for this prioritization shall be determined by the Center for Rural Pennsylvania's municipal data;(ii) promote supplier diversity and, where possible, increase business opportunities for businesses recognized by the Department of General Services as verified as a 20250HB0764PN0788 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 small diverse business or a small veteran business; or(iii) are located in or serve a USDA-designated food desert.(2) For regional anchor supermarket projects, those with matching funds under subsection (e) shall be prioritized.(d) Project class.--The department shall make grants available in the following classes:(1) Regional anchor supermarkets.(2) Grocery stores.(3) Retail food establishments.(e) Matching funds.--Grants in an amount not to exceed 15% of the funding for any of the project classes established under subsection (d) shall be awarded to qualifying applicants selected to receive the awards for the purposes of capital projects. Grants for capital projects must be matched by private money in an amount equal to the State grant.(f) Administrative or operational costs.--No more than 10% of the funding under section 12108 (relating to grant money) may be reserved for administrative and operational costs to manage the program. Costs for personnel may be included as part of the department's administrative or operational costs.§ 12106. Grant fund eligibility.(a) Eligible applicants.--A for-profit, nonprofit or cooperative entity that meets the following criteria shall be eligible to apply for a grant under the program:(1) The primary business, measured as being greater than or equal to 50% of the entity's previous year's annual revenue, is from the sale of staple and perishable food to consumers or direct to retail settings.(2) The entity operates and provides service in this 20250HB0764PN0788 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth.(3) The entity serves customers that live in a low-income or moderate-income community.(4) The entity provides access to affordable, high- quality fresh produce, meat and dairy products and other grocery items for low-to-moderate income shoppers.(5) Eligible projects are supported by the community as determined by the department using maps, data tools and other forms of market research.(b) Eligible uses.--An eligible use for grant money includes any of the following:(1) Equipment purchases that improve the availability and quality of fresh produce, meat and dairy products and other grocery items.(2) Innovative food access technology that assists an existing or new grocery store.(3) Innovative food access technology that assists the food access efforts of a retail food establishment.(4) Innovative food access technology or delivery of food to retail that assists the food access efforts of an eligible applicant.(c) Application review and approval.--The department shall devise, award and administer grants to eligible applicants.(d) Standards and requirements.--(1) The department shall establish grant program standards and requirements for a grant program under this chapter and shall transmit notice of the grant program standards and requirements to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.20250HB0764PN0788 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Grant program standards and requirements must do the following:(i) Establish eligibility standards for applicants.(ii) Describe the objectives of the grant program, which shall be consistent with this chapter.(iii) Establish caps, limits and restrictions with respect to grant amounts.(iv) Establish an application process and timetable.(v) Present the criteria under which grant applications shall be evaluated by the department.(vi) Establish a timetable within which the department shall award or disapprove a completed grant application.(vii) Establish procedures by which the department shall verify expenditures of grant money by a grant recipient.(e) Limitation on grants.--(1) Grants may only be awarded to the extent money is appropriated by the General Assembly.(2) The secretary may approve a grant in less than a requested amount. The secretary may also impose restrictions or special conditions upon the issuance of a grant.(f) Disposition of grants.--(1) The department may require a written agreement describing the terms and conditions of the grant.(2) The department may establish criteria under which the secretary may demand the return of all or a portion of the grant money.§ 12107. Regulations.The department may promulgate rules and regulations to 20250HB0764PN0788 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 administer and enforce this chapter.§ 12108. Grant money.(a) Establishment of account.--The Fresh Food Financing Initiative Restricted Account is established in the General Fund and shall be used exclusively for the program in accordance with this chapter. The money in the account is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for the purposes of this chapter.(b) Supplements to account.--In addition to State money appropriated to the department for the program, the department may also accept gifts, donations, legacies and other revenues, including Federal appropriations, for deposit into the restricted account.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0764PN0788 - 8 - 1234567891011121314